Missouri, session 2026, HB1642.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 488, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 488.071, to read as follows:
488.071. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
2 county commission of any county of the third classification may withhold and use up to
3 fifty percent of all court costs and court fees collected in such county for new courthouse
4 construction projects or renovation of an existing courthouse project.
5 2. No county shall use court costs and court fees withheld under subsection 1 of
6 this section for more than seven consecutive years per project.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.